Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.050

Prostitution—Sex of parties immaterial—No defense.

In any prosecution for prostitution, the sex of the two parties or prospective parties to the sexual conduct engaged in, contemplated, or solicited is immaterial, and it is no defense that:

(1) Such persons were of the same sex; or

(2) The person who received, agreed to receive, or solicited a fee was a male and the person who paid or agreed or offered to pay such fee was female.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.050.]